California statutes. Water Code
(d) This section does not apply to groundwater pumping by the Eastern Water Alliance Joint Powers Agency for export from the Eastern San Joaquin County Basin, as described on pages 38 and 39 of the Department of Water Resources Bulletin No. 118-80, provided that the groundwater pumping is approved by San Joaquin County pursuant to its ordinances regulating the management and export of groundwater as these ordinances are in effect at the time of permit approval by San Joaquin County. Section 10753.1 applies to any groundwater regulation under this section. As used in this section, the term “groundwater” has the same definition as set forth in in subdivision (a) of Section 10752.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 740, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1221.

This article shall not be construed to authorize the board to regulate groundwater in any manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1655, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1222.

Nothing in this article shall be deemed to diminish the rights and protections to watersheds of origin contained in existing law including, but not limited to, Part 4.5 (commencing with Section 12200) of Division 6.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1655, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Exclusive Method of Appropriation [1225. - 1225.]

1225.

Except as provided in Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 1226) of this chapter, no right to appropriate or use water subject to appropriation shall be initiated or acquired except upon compliance with the provisions of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 140.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Stockponds [1226. - 1226.4.]

1226.

The Legislature finds and declares that it is necessary and beneficial to the state to clear up many heretofore uncertain conditions of water rights which are the result of a large number of dams and other water impoundment structures which have been constructed for livestock watering use, including domestic and recreational use which is incidental to livestock use; that these structures have been constructed, many at the urging of local, state and federal government, as a matter of practical necessity by the owners or users of the land on which they exist; that these structures have been built without clearly defined water rights as a result of the uncertainty of the state law and the lack of information by the owners as to proper procedures by which to obtain a water right; and that it is in the interest of the state to clarify the right to the water impounded by these structures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 140.)
-------------------------------------------

1226.1.

The owner of any dam or other water impoundment structure constructed prior to January 1, 1969, the capacity of which is not in excess of 10 acre-feet on January 1, 1975, and concerning which water rights litigation between private parties was not a matter of record prior to January 1, 1974, is declared to have a valid water right for the use of the water for purposes as specified in Section 1226, if that person files a claim of water right with the board not later than December 31, 1997. All permits or licenses issued by the board prior to the effective date of this article shall have priority over any water right claimed pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 667, Sec. 4.   Effective September 20, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1226.2.

(a) Any person who has a valid water right pursuant to Section 1226.1, who files a claim of water right with the board on or before December 31, 1977, has a water right priority as of the date of the construction of the dam or other water impoundment structure.

(b) Any person who has a valid water right pursuant to Section 1226.1, who files a claim of water right with the board after December 31, 1977, and before January 1, 1998, has a water right priority as of the date of filing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 667, Sec. 5.   Effective September 20, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1226.3.

Each claim of water right shall be accompanied by a fee which shall be in an amount determined by the board to cover the reasonable administrative costs of processing the claim. If the claimant establishes a water right pursuant to this article, the board shall issue a certificate of the validity of the water right to the claimant as expeditiously as practicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 667, Sec. 6.   Effective September 20, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1226.4.

The board may, after notice and hearing, revoke any certificate of a water right granted pursuant to this article upon a finding that the water has ceased to be used for the purposes specified in Section 1226.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 667, Sec. 7.   Effective September 20, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.6. Nonreserved Water Rights for Federal Uses [1227. - 1227.4.]

1227.

The Legislature finds and declares that it is in the public interest to provide a priority of right to appropriate water for various beneficial water uses which were initiated by the United States, or its agencies, on reserved lands prior to July 3, 1978, and which uses are for secondary purposes, other than those for which the federal reservation was created, provided that the priority of right does not impair any existing water right.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 670, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1227.1.

(a) To obtain the priority of right set forth in Section 1227, any agency of the United States shall submit to the board, on or before July 1, 1984, a statement for each water use initiated under claim of right by the United States on reserved lands for which beneficial use of water was initiated on or before July 3, 1978, concerning which water rights litigation was not a matter of record prior to July 3, 1978, and which use is for secondary purposes other than those for which the federal reservation was created.

(b) Each statement shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following: 

(1) The name and address of the agency of the United States which maintains the federal water project.

(2) The name and address of the person who is responsible for the day-to-day operations of the federal water project.

(3) The name of the stream or other source from which the water is being appropriated and the name of the next major stream or other body of water to which the source is tributary.

(4) The point of diversion and place of use.

(5) The purpose of the use.

(6) A general description of the area in which the water is used.

(7) The year in which the diversion was commenced or as near as is known.

(8) Any information tending to indicate the quantity of water used, as may be prescribed by the board.

(c) The board shall make available to any person upon request copies of statements filed pursuant to this section for federal water uses within a particular county. Any person may file a request for special notice, by county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 670, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1227.2.

(a) Subject to subdivisions (b) and (c), any use for which a statement is submitted to the board pursuant to Section 1227.1 has a priority for the appropriation of water as of the date of initial use of the water, except that all permits and licenses issued by the board on applications, including those filed by the department pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 6, filed prior to July 1, 1984, have priority over any water right claimed by the United States pursuant to this article. Any use for which a statement is required shall be subject to Article 3 (commencing with Section 11460) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 6, in a like manner as the Central Valley Project.

(b) The scope of any appropriative right recognized pursuant to this article, including terms and conditions judged necessary by the board to best develop, conserve, and utilize the appropriated water in the public interest, shall be determined when that scope is at issue in any of the following proceedings:

(1) A proceeding upon an application, permit, or license of another, pursuant to this part, where the United States is a protestant or interested party.

(2) A proceeding to determine all rights to water of a stream system pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 2500) of Part 3.

(3) A general adjudication of water rights commenced in the courts of this state.

(4) A proceeding to determine whether the board should commence an action pursuant to Section 1052, whether the United States is a complainant or a respondent.

(5) A proceeding under Section 275 and rules of the board in implementation thereof, whether the United States is a complainant or a respondent.

(c) The board shall, following any determination pursuant to subdivision (b), issue evidence of the scope of the right so determined; provided, that in no event, either prior or subsequent to the determination, shall the right exceed the amount of water that may be reasonably used without waste and under reasonable methods of use and diversion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 670, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1227.3.

This article does not apply to uses involving the appropriation of water by any person, including any agency of the United States, pursuant to the Federal Reclamation Law, as amended or supplemented, or any other federal statute which authorizes projects for the development of water for uses other than uses upon reserved federal lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 670, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1227.4.

The board may, after following procedures set forth in Sections 1675 to 1675.2, inclusive, revoke any water right determined pursuant to this article upon a finding that the water has ceased to be used for a purpose for which the original development was intended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 670, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.7. Registration of Appropriations for Small Domestic, Small Irrigation, and Livestock Stockpond Uses [1228. - 1229.1.]

1228.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the Water Rights Permitting Reform Act of 1988.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1040, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1228.1.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that it is in the public interest to provide a timely, efficient, and economic procedure for the acquisition of rights to appropriate water for a small domestic use, including incidental stock watering and irrigation uses, a small irrigation use, and for a livestock stockpond subject to prior rights.

(b) As used in this article:

(1) “Small domestic use” means a domestic use, as that use is defined by board rule, or a use for aesthetic, fire protection, recreational, or fish and wildlife purposes that is associated with a dwelling or other facility for human occupation, that does not exceed direct diversion of 4,500
 gallons per day or diversion to storage of 10 acre-feet per year.

(2) “Small irrigation use” means either of the following:

(A) An irrigation use, heat control use, or frost protection use, not to exceed diversion to storage of 20 acre-feet per year, including impoundment for incidental aesthetic, fire protection, recreational, or fish and wildlife purposes.

(B) An irrigation use not to exceed direct diversion of 42,000 gallons per day, up to a maximum of 20 acre-feet per year.

(3) “Livestock stockpond” means a water impoundment structure constructed for livestock watering use not to exceed direct diversion of 4,500 gallons per day, or diversion to storage of 10 acre-feet per year, as that use is defined by the board, and including impoundment for
 incidental aesthetic, fire protection, recreational, or fish and wildlife purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 683, Sec. 45.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1228.2.

(a) (1) Subject to subdivision (b), a person may obtain a right to appropriate water for a small domestic, small irrigation, or livestock stockpond use upon first registering the use with the board and thereafter applying the water to reasonable and beneficial use with due diligence.

(2) With regard to an appropriation for small domestic use, a registration shall not be filed for a facility served by or used pursuant to a permit or license for domestic or municipal use, and not more than one small domestic use registration shall be in effect at any time for any facility. A small domestic use registration and a livestock stockpond use registration may be in effect for the same facility if the total
 combined water use covered by the registrations does not exceed 10 acre-feet per year.

(3) With regard to an appropriation for small irrigation use, more than one registration may be in effect at any time for a registrant if the diversion or storage facilities subject to registration for a registrant do not exceed the ratio of one per 20 irrigated acres, and if the total water use on all acreage covered by the registrations, including any water use based on other rights, does not exceed 100 acre-feet per year.

(4) A small domestic use registration and a small irrigation use registration, or a livestock stockpond use registration and a small irrigation use registration, may be in effect for the same facility only if the total combined water use covered by the registrations does not exceed 20 acre-feet per year.

(5) With regard to an appropriation for livestock stockpond use, more than one registration may be in effect at any time for a registrant if stockponds subject to registration for that registrant do not exceed the ratio of one per 50 acres.

(b) Initiation of rights to appropriate water pursuant to this article shall be subject to Article 1.3 (commencing with Section 1205), relating to fully appropriated stream systems. The board shall not accept a registration of water use which proposes as a source of water supply a stream system which has been unconditionally declared by the board to be fully appropriated pursuant to Section 1205, except that subdivision (b) of Section 1206, relating to conditional declarations of fully appropriated stream systems, shall apply to registration of water use pursuant to this article, and the board shall accept those registrations where consistent with the conditions specified in the declaration.

(c) The board shall annually prepare and post on its Internet Web site information summarizing the location, nature, and amount of water appropriated pursuant to this article. The information shall include a description of the availability of unappropriated water in those stream systems which may become fully appropriated within the next reporting period.

(d) If a registration is filed with a source of supply on a stream system that the most recent report submitted under subdivision (c) identifies as a stream system that may become fully appropriated within the next reporting period, the registration shall not take effect unless the board finds that unappropriated water is available for the appropriation proposed by the registration. If the board finds that unappropriated water is not available to supply the proposed appropriation, the board shall, following notice and hearing,
 determine whether that stream system should be declared fully appropriated pursuant to Article 1.3 (commencing with Section 1205).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 683, Sec. 46.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1228.3.

(a) Registration of water use pursuant to this article shall be made upon a form prescribed by the board. The registration form shall set forth all of the following:

(1) The name and post office address of the registrant.

(2) The source of water supply.

(3) The nature and amount of the proposed use.

(4) The proposed place of diversion.

(5) The place where it is intended to use the water.

(6) The time for completion of construction of diversion works and for complete application of the water to the proposed use.

(7) A certification that the registrant has contacted a representative of the Department of Fish and Wildlife designated by that department for that purpose, has provided information to that department that is set forth in the registration form, and has agreed to comply with all lawful conditions, including, but not limited to, conditions upon the construction and operation of diversion works, required by the Department of Fish and Wildlife. The certification shall include a copy of any conditions required by the Department of Fish and Wildlife pursuant to this paragraph.

(8) Any other information that may reasonably be required by the board.

(b) Registration of water use shall be deemed completed on the date that the form, executed in substantial compliance with the requirements of this section, and the registration fee specified in Section 1525 are received by the board.

(c) The board shall issue monthly a list of registrations filed under this article during the preceding calendar month. This list shall contain the information required by paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (a). The list shall set forth a date prior to which an interested person may file a written protest in opposition to the approval of a stockpond registration. That date shall be not later than 30 days from the date on which the list is issued. The board shall mail the monthly list of registrations filed to a person who requests the list.

(d) Prior to the date set forth on the list required under subdivision (c), an
 interested person may file with the board a written protest in opposition to the approval of a stockpond registration. The protest shall clearly set forth the protestant’s objections to the registered use based on interference with prior rights. The protest shall be served on the registrant by the protestant by mailing a duplicate copy of the protest to the registrant, or through service undertaken in another manner determined to be adequate by the board. The procedures set forth in Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 1345) of Chapter 5 shall be used for reviewing a protested registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 683, Sec. 47.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1228.4.

(a) Any completed registration of water use gives to the registrant a priority of right as of the date of completed registration to take and use the amount of water ultimately applied with due diligence to reasonable and beneficial use thereunder, which amount shall not exceed the amount of proposed use as shown on the registration form.

(b) Any right obtained pursuant to this article shall remain in effect unless and until any of the following occur:

(1) The right is forfeited for nonuse pursuant to Section 1241, or abandoned. 

(2) The right is revoked because the registrant knowingly made any false statement, or knowingly concealed any material fact, in the registration.

(3) The right is revoked for failure to renew the registration as provided in this article.

(4) The right is revoked pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1228.6.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1040, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1228.5.

(a) Registration of a small domestic, small irrigation, or livestock stockpond use pursuant to this article shall be renewed prior to the expiration of each five-year period following completed registration.

(b) Registrations for which all annual fees have been timely paid and all annual reports have been timely submitted at the expiration of the five-year registration shall be renewed by operation of law.

(c) The conditions established by the board pursuant to Section 1228.6 that are in effect at the time of renewal of registration shall supersede the conditions that were applicable to the original completed
 registration.

(d) A registration for which fees or water use reports remain outstanding at the expiration of the five-year registration period shall be revoked by operation of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 401, Sec. 14.   (AB 1520)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1228.6.

(a) The board shall establish, and may from time to time revise, reasonable general conditions to which all appropriations made pursuant to this article shall be subject. The conditions shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

(1) The appropriation is subject to prior rights.

(2) All conditions lawfully required by the Department of Fish and Wildlife are conditions upon the appropriations.

(3) Diversion works shall be constructed and water applied to beneficial use with due diligence.

(4) Registration shall be renewed and water use reported pursuant to law and to the rules of the board.

(b) Immediately upon registration pursuant to Section 1228.3, renewal of registration pursuant to Section 1228.5, or amended registration pursuant to Section 1228.7, the board shall provide the registrant with a written document setting forth the conditions required by this section, and the perfection and exercise of rights acquired pursuant to this article shall at all times be subject to those conditions.

(c) The conditions required by this section shall be deemed “terms and conditions” within the meaning of Section 1825 and the expression of legislative intent contained in that section shall be applicable thereto. The authority of the board to enforce the terms and conditions of permits and licenses to appropriate water, and to prevent the unlawful diversion of
 water, including, but not limited to, provisions regarding cease and desist orders and the revocation of permits and licenses, shall be applicable to appropriations initiated or perfected pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 683, Sec. 48.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1228.7.

(a) A registrant may change the point of diversion or place of use by delivering to the board an amended registration form in accordance with Section 1228.3, including payment of the registration fee specified in Section 1525, except that the purpose of the use shall not be changed and the change shall not operate to the injury of any legal user of the water involved.

(b) A completed amended registration of water use continues in effect the priority of right as of the date of the original completed registration.

(c) All provisions of this article regarding appropriations made pursuant thereto, including, but not
 limited to, provisions regarding enforcement, are applicable to the appropriation as described in the completed amended registration, except that the conditions established by the board pursuant to Section 1228.6 that are in effect at the time of completion of the amended registration shall supersede the conditions that were applicable to the original completed registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 288, Sec. 9.   (SB 1169)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1229.

(a) The board is not required to adopt general conditions for small irrigation use pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1228.6 until the board determines that funds are available for that purpose.

(b) A registration for small irrigation use pursuant to this article is not authorized until the board establishes general conditions for small irrigation use pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1228.6 to protect instream beneficial uses.

(c) The board may establish general conditions for some methods of diversion or categories of small irrigation use before establishing general conditions for other methods or categories, in which case a registration for small
 irrigation use is authorized only for those methods or categories for which the board has established the general conditions for the protection of instream beneficial uses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 683, Sec. 49.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1229.1.

(a) This article does not apply to those stream segments for which the Director of Fish and Wildlife establishes proposed streamflow requirements pursuant to Section 10002 of the Public Resources Code, notwithstanding the July 1, 1989, deadline for preparation of the requirements.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), this article applies to a registration filed before the Director of Fish and Wildlife establishes proposed streamflow requirements for the source of water supply for the registration. The conditions for renewal under subdivision (c) of Section 1228.5 may include any conditions the Department of Fish and Wildlife determines to be necessary to protect stream-related fish and wildlife resources on a source of
 water supply for which the Director of Fish and Wildlife has established proposed streamflow requirements pursuant to Section 10002 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 683, Sec. 50.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Appropriation from Interstate Streams [1230. - 1231.]

1230.

If the waters of an interstate body of water have been allocated between California and another state or Indian tribe by a compact, United States Supreme Court decree, or other appropriate method of allocating interstate waters, the board shall exercise its authority under this division in a manner consistent with the rights and responsibilities of the State of California under that interstate allocation and Section 1231 does not apply to the extent it is inconsistent with that interstate allocation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 274, Sec. 3.   (AB 2759)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1231.

(a) A right of appropriation from a stream that flows across the state boundary that has the point of diversion and the place of use in another state and is
 recognized by the laws of that state shall have the same force and effect as if the point of diversion and the place of use were in this State if the laws of that state give like force and effect to similar rights acquired in this State.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to interstate lakes, or streams flowing in or out of those lakes. Subdivision (a) applies where an appropriation or change in point of diversion, place of use, or purpose of use is proposed or made under either of the following:

(1) A right to the use of waters from the Truckee River if the appropriation or change is made pursuant to the operating agreement described in Section 205(a) of Public Law 101-618.

(2) A right to the use of waters from the Walker River and its tributaries if the appropriation or change is not inconsistent with the decree entered in United States v. Walker River Irrigation District, et. al. United States District Court for the District of Nevada Equity No. C-125, filed April 15, 1936, including any amendments to that decree entered before or after January 1,
 2015.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 274, Sec. 4.   (AB 2759)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Beneficial Use [1240. - 1244.]

1240.

The appropriation must be for some useful or beneficial purpose, and when the appropriator or his successor in interest ceases to use it for such a purpose the right ceases.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1241.

If the person entitled to the use of water fails to use beneficially all or any part of the water claimed by him or her, for which a right of use has vested, for the purpose for which it was appropriated or adjudicated, for a period of five years, that unused water may revert to the public and shall, if reverted, be regarded as unappropriated public water. That reversion shall occur upon a finding by the board following notice to the permittee, licensee, or person holding a livestock stockpond certificate or small domestic use, small irrigation use, or livestock stockpond use registration under this part and a public hearing if requested by the permittee, licensee, certificate holder, or registration holder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 579, Sec. 8.   (AB 964)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1241.6.

If water appropriated for irrigation purposes is not used by reason of compliance with crop control or soil conservation contracts with the United States, and in other cases of hardship as the board may by rule prescribe, the five-year forfeiture period applicable to water appropriated pursuant to the Water Commission Act or this code, and the forfeiture period applicable to water appropriated prior to December 19, 1914, shall be extended by an additional period of not more than 10 years or the duration of any crop control or soil conservation contracts with the United States if less than 10 years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 288, Sec. 12.   (SB 1169)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1242.

The storing of water underground, including the diversion of streams and the flowing of water on lands necessary to the accomplishment of such storage, constitutes a beneficial use of water if the water so stored is thereafter applied to the beneficial purposes for which the appropriation for storage was made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1242.1.

The diversion of floodflows for groundwater recharge shall not require an appropriative water right if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) (1) A local or regional agency that has adopted a local plan of flood control pursuant to Section 8201 or has considered flood risk as part of its most recently adopted general plan has given notice via its internet website, electronic distribution list, emergency notification service, or another means of public notice, that flows downstream of the point of diversion are at imminent risk of flooding and inundation of land, roads, or structures.

(2) As used in this section, “floodflow” means any of the following:

(A) Where a waterbody is subject to a defined flood stage, flows in excess of flood stage where actions are necessary to avoid threats to human health and safety.

(B) (i) Except as provided in clause (ii), where a waterbody is not subject to a defined flood stage, surface water escaped from or is likely to imminently escape from a channel or waterbody causing or threatening to cause inundation of residential or commercial structures, or roads needed for emergency response. Likely imminent escape from a channel or waterbody shall be demonstrated by measured flows in excess of the maximum design capacity of a flood control project, where such a project is present and the maximum design capacity is readily available information.

(ii) This subparagraph does not apply to flows that inundate wetlands,
 working lands, or floodplains, events that constitute a “design flood,” groundwater seepage, or waters confined to a “designated floodway.”

(C) Where flows would inundate ordinarily dry areas in the bed of a terminal lake to a depth that floods dairies and other ongoing agricultural activities, or areas with substantial residential, commercial, or industrial development.

(3) As used in this subdivision, “imminent” means a high degree of confidence that a condition will begin in the immediate future.

(b) The diversions cease when the flood conditions described in the public notice provided pursuant to subdivision (a) have abated to the point there is no longer a risk of flooding and inundation of land, roads, or structures downstream of the point of diversion.

(c) Any water diverted is not diverted to, and will not be applied to, any of the following:

(1) Any barns, ponds, or lands where manure or waste from an animal facility that generates waste from the feeding and housing of animals for more than 45 days per year in a confined area that is not vegetated are applied.

(2) Any agricultural field that has been identified as an outlier with respect to nitrogen application by any of the following:

(A) The board.

(B) The appropriate regional board.

(C) An agricultural coalition charged with implementation of the Irrigated Lands Regulatory Program.

(3) Any area that could
 cause damage to critical levees, infrastructure, wastewater and drinking water systems, drinking water wells or drinking water supplies, or exacerbate the threat of flood and other health and safety concerns.

(4) Any area that has not been in active irrigated agricultural cultivation within the past three years, including grazing lands, annual grasslands, and natural habitats. This limitation does not apply to facilities already constructed for the purpose of groundwater recharge or managed wetlands.

(d) With respect to diversions from water tributaries to the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta (Delta), water rights holders are not making releases of stored water or reoperating facilities to provide flow for the purposes of meeting water quality control plan or endangered species requirements in the Delta at the time of the diversion.

(e) The diversion of floodflows for groundwater recharge uses the following as part of the diversion:

(1) Either existing diversion infrastructure or temporary pumps.

(2) Existing groundwater recharge locations, where available.

(3) No new permanent infrastructure or permanent construction.

(4) For diversions directly from rivers or streams, protective screens on temporary pump intakes to minimize the impacts of diversion to fish and other aquatic life. Such screens shall be constructed of any rigid material, perforated, woven, or slotted, that provides water passage while physically excluding fish. The screen face shall be parallel to the flow and adjacent to the water’s edge. The upstream and downstream transitions to the screen structure
 shall be designed and constructed to minimize eddies upstream of, in front of, and downstream of the screen, while minimizing entrainment to the degree feasible. Prior to implementing this paragraph, the Department of Fish and Wildlife shall conduct at least one public workshop to review recommended design parameters and ranges of scenarios for deployment and use of protective screens. These recommendations and any other guidelines provided by the Department of Fish and Wildlife on the implementation of this paragraph shall not be subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(f) The person or entity making the diversion for groundwater recharge does not claim any water right based on that diversion and recharge.

(g) (1) The person or entity making the
 diversion for groundwater recharge files all of the following with the board and with any applicable groundwater sustainability agency, as defined in Section 10721, for the basin:

(A) A notice that provides the information specified in Subparagraphs (A) through (C), inclusive, of paragraph (2), 48 hours before whenever feasible, and in no event later than 48 hours after initially commencing diversion of floodflows for groundwater recharge.

(B) A preliminary report no later than 14 days after initially commencing diversion of floodflows for groundwater recharge.

(C) A final report no later than 15 days after diversions cease.

(2) The preliminary and final reports shall do all of the following:

(A) Identify the person or entity making the diversion for groundwater recharge.

(B) Provide the Global Positioning System (GPS) coordinates for the point of diversion, a map identifying the approximate area inundated by the floodflows, and the corresponding assessor parcel numbers.

(C) Identify the time when diversions of floodflows to groundwater recharge commenced, and, for final reports, when diversions ceased.

(D) Provide an estimate, as of the report’s date, of the amount of floodflows diverted for groundwater recharge.

(h) This section shall only apply to diversions commenced before January 1, 2029.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 25.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1242.2.

(a) The board shall post on its internet website all reports received pursuant to Section 1242.1.

(b) On an annual basis, until January 1, 2029, the board shall compile information on the reports it receives pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 1242.1 to identify the number of projects, estimated amount of water diverted and recharged, and locations of recharge projects implemented under this section and post this information on its internet website. The board may include recommendations to increase the amount of water diverted for recharge while protecting groundwater quality, public safety, and fish and wildlife resources in this annual report.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 26.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1242.3.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(1) California’s central valley has one of the highest flood risks in the United States. Recognizing this risk and in response to the Court of Appeal decision in Paterno v. State of California (2003) 113 Cal. App.4th 998, in 2007, the Legislature enacted the Central Valley Flood Protection Act of 2008, which along with other provisions requires the projected impacts of climate change on the State Plan of Flood Control to be included the Central Valley Flood Protection Plan and each five-year update to the Central Valley Flood Protection Plan.

(2) According to the 2022 Update of the Central Valley Flood Protection Plan, by 2072,
 climate change is predicted to increase peak floodflows up to five times in the central valley compared to past recorded events, and the anticipated peak flows by 2072 will only exacerbate this risk unless urgent action is taken. Climate change science predicts that atmospheric rivers will become stronger and wetter, increasing their potential to cause catastrophic events that could overwhelm many parts of the current flood system, if improvements and other strategies are not implemented.

(3) The Legislature enacts Section 1242.1, as applied in the Sacramento and San Joaquin watersheds, with the intention of adapting the State Plan of Flood Control to continuing climate change with a reasonable plan for quickly reducing the level of floodflows by diverting water, where feasible, to lands adjacent to watercourses and state-federal levees for recharging groundwater.

(4) Given
 rapidly changing hydrologic conditions, Section 1242.1 establishes a reasonable plan for reducing risk of flood damages to lands within the State Plan of Flood Control. Risk of flooding may remain and may be incidental to the actions authorized by Section 1242.1, but the state is acting to reduce that risk.

(b) The state shall not be liable for flood damages related to actions authorized by Section 1242.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 27.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1242.5.
